Wyoming, session 2025, HB0292.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-2-1012(e) and 9-2-1013(d)(ii) are
amended to read:

9-2-1012. Duties of the department; transmittal of
standard budget and manual; return of completed exception
and expanded budgets; submission to governor; disposition
of excess general fund appropriations; submission of
HB0292

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0707
selected budget information to joint appropriations
committee.

(e) In preparing the overall state budget for
distribution to the legislature, including any
supplemental, budget shortfall or other emergency changes
to the budget, the governor shall recommend to the
legislature that not less than five percent (5%) ten
percent (10%) of estimated general fund receipts for the
next biennial budget period shall be appropriated from the
general fund to the budget reserve account within the
earmarked fund. This appropriation shall be in addition to
any fund balance within the budget reserve account. At the
end of each biennial budget period, general fund
appropriations for the biennium in excess of expenditures
including encumbrances during the biennium, as identified
by the state auditor in accordance with the provisions of
W.S. 9-2-1008 and 9-4-207, shall be transferred into the
budget reserve account. All funds in the budget reserve
account shall be invested by the state treasurer and
earnings therefrom shall be credited into the general fund.
Appropriations to the account shall not lapse at the end of
HB0292

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0707
any fiscal period. Expenditures from the budget reserve
account shall be by legislative appropriation only.

9-2-1013. State budget; distribution of copies to
legislators; copies and reports of authorizations;
interfund loans.

(d) In addition to the items contained in subsection
(a) of this section and notwithstanding any other
recommendations made by the governor, the state budget
shall also include the governor's recommendations for
appropriations for the ensuing two (2) years, or if a
supplemental budget request, the remainder of the budget
period, subject to the following:

(ii) The total recommended appropriations under
this subsection for any two (2) fiscal year budget period
shall not exceed the total estimated revenues for that two
(2) year period. The total estimated revenues computed
under this paragraph shall not include increases in
existing revenue sources which would be available to the
state only after enactment of legislation in addition to
existing law, but shall include the unencumbered balances
HB0292

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0707
in all other accounts in all other expendable funds subject
to this section, and as further provided herein, as those
funds are identified in accordance with standards
promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board,
but specifically excluding pension funds, nonexpendable
trust funds, debt service funds and intragovernmental
funds, that would be available for that budget period.
Funds within the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund
reserve account created under W.S. 9-4-719(b), the common
school permanent fund reserve account created under W.S.
9-4-719(f), funds within the legislative stabilization
reserve account in excess of the limitation under
subparagraph (iii)(C) of this section, or funds within five
percent (5%) ten percent (10%) of estimated general fund
receipts for the next biennium to be appropriated to the
budget reserve account as required by W.S. 9-2-1012(e)
shall not be included in total estimated revenues computed
under this paragraph. Funds from a contingent
appropriation shall not be included as an estimated source
of revenue or funds available unless those funds previously
had been authorized to be expended within the fiscal period
covering the budget period of the recommendation;

HB0292

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0707
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0292